Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 22

Department of Tourist Development

4-3-2201. Creation — Commissioner as chief administrator.

There is hereby established the department of tourist development, the chief administrator of which shall be the commissioner of tourist development.

Acts 1976, ch. 468, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-345.

Compiler's Notes. The department of tourist development, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

Acts 2006, ch. 586, § 1 provided that the department of tourist development is encouraged to conduct a study to determine the feasibility of designing, manufacturing, distributing, and selling of commemorative Tennessee license plates for display on the front of motor vehicles and for the purpose of generating revenue for promotion of tourism in Tennessee.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of tourist development, §4-3-101.

4-3-2202. Appointment of commissioner — Qualifications.

The commissioner shall be appointed by the governor to serve at the governor's pleasure and shall receive a salary in accordance with § 8-23-101.

The commissioner shall be a person qualified by training and experience to perform the duties of the commissioner's office.

Acts 1976, ch. 468, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-345.

4-3-2203. Divisions — Creation.

The commissioner is authorized to create, with the approval of the governor, such new divisions as are necessary to carry out the duties imposed upon the commissioner and the department.

Acts 1976, ch. 468, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-346; Acts 2013, ch. 132, § 3.

Cross-References. Creation of tourism division, §4-3-2204.

Reorganization of divisions, §4-4-101.

4-3-2204. Tourism division — Creation — Director — Personnel — Duties.

There shall be in the department of tourist development, a tourism division, to be under the direction and charge of the commissioner of tourist development, who shall, however, appoint a person to be known as the director of the tourism division, who shall perform such duties respecting the work of the division as the commissioner shall, from time to time, prescribe.

The director shall be a competent person, having executive ability and properly informed on the plans and methods of public contracts, publicity, advertising and tourist promotion, and shall have charge of all active functions of the division and the enforcement of the orders, rules and regulations of the commissioner, subject to and under the commissioner's jurisdiction and direction.

The commissioner may transfer to such division, or assign to its work, any employees of the department, and, subject to appropriations, may appoint or employ such other persons as the commissioner may find necessary for the work of the division in carrying out this section and §§ 4-3-2206 — 4-3-2208.

The division shall promote new investment in the tourist industry, provide comprehensive services to existing tourist enterprises, promote in other states the attractions of Tennessee, distribute Tennessee informational publications and supervise the system of welcome centers in the state.

Acts 1937, ch. 281, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.35 (Williams, § 630.26); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 852, §§ 12, 14; impl. am. Acts 1976, ch. 468, § 2; Acts 1976, ch. 468, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 4-346, 11-601, 11-25-101.

Cross-References. Authority of commissioner to create divisions, §4-3-2203.

4-3-2205. [Reserved.]

The commissioner, acting through the tourism division, shall, in accordance with the rules, regulations, policies and procedures of the state publications committee:

Collect, compile and distribute literature as to the facilities, advantages and attractions of the state, the historic, recreational and scenic points and places of interest within the state and the transportation and highway facilities of the state;

Plan and conduct a program of information and publicity designed to attract to the state tourists, visitors and other interested persons from outside the state, and also encourage and coordinate the efforts of other public and private organizations or groups of citizens to publicize the facilities and attractions of the state for the same purposes;

Publicize the material and economic advantages of the state that render it a desirable place for business and residence; and

Carry on such educational programs as are necessary to familiarize the people of the state with the scenic, historical, industrial, recreational and agricultural advantages or needs of the state.

To carry out the purpose and intent of this section and §§ 4-3-2204, 4-3-2207, and 4-3-2208, the commissioner is authorized and empowered to:

Form contracts with agencies of any type or wherever situated, that will tend to promote the objectives of advertising Tennessee to nonresidents;

Gather and compile, in accordance with the rules, regulations, policies and procedures of the state publications committee, information from branches of the state government and others, that will promote authentic information for advertising purposes;

Enter into cooperative agreements and contracts with such individuals, partnerships, corporations public or private, associations, societies, educational institutions, chambers of commerce, automobile associations, and other organized groups as may be deemed advantageous and proper by the commissioner to effectuate the intent and purpose of this section and §§ 4-3-2204, 4-3-2207, and 4-3-2208; provided, that an authenticated copy of all such contracts shall be filed with the comptroller of the treasury and shall be approved by the attorney general and reporter;

Accept unconditional gifts of money to be expended in furtherance of the purposes of this section and §§ 4-3-2204, 4-3-2207, and 4-3-2208;

Within the limits of available funds, match any moneys advanced for the purposes of this section and §§ 4-3-2204, 4-3-2207, and 4-3-2208, by the federal government, or by any state, county, municipality, corporation, association, society, development district, regional council, association of local governments or individual; and

Within the limits of available funds, enter into such cooperative agreements or contracts with any instrumentality of the federal government, municipal or county government of Tennessee, or any other state or group of states that, in the judgment of the commissioner, will effectuate the purposes of this section and §§ 4-3-2204, 4-3-2207, and 4-3-2208.

Acts 1937, ch. 281, §§ 2, 3; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 630.36, 630.37 (Williams, § 630.28); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 852, §§ 12, 14; impl. am. Acts 1976, ch. 468, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 11-602, 11-603, 11-25-102, 11-25-103; Acts 1990, ch. 1024, §§ 6, 7; 2009, ch. 125, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the rest area system, excluding the rest area in Smith County, in the department of tourist development and its related functions to the department of transportation, see Executive Order No. 44 (February 4, 1991).

Cross-References. Powers and duties of tourism division, §4-3-2204.

4-3-2207. Regional tourist promotion — State assistance.

It is the intent of the state to assist financially with the development of regional plans for tourist promotion and for coordination of activities thereunder.

From and after the creation of any regularly chartered, nonprofit tourist promotion organization or a tax exempt public agency representing all the area within a planning region of this state as delineated by the [former] state planning office and reiterated by Executive Order No. 17, and when the local people shall indicate their willingness to contribute financially, then the state shall be authorized to match such local contributions up to a maximum of thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) annually on the basis of two dollars ($2.00) in matching state funds for each one dollar ($1.00) contributed by the local people involved. The aggregate of such funds may also be used for purposes of matching various federal programs of assistance for tourist promotion. Cities and counties are specifically authorized to appropriate and expend funds for carrying out the purposes of this section and §§ 4-3-2204, 4-3-2206, and 4-3-2208.

Each organization operating under this section and §§ 4-3-2204, 4-3-2206, and 4-3-2208 shall operate subject to the supervision and control of the commissioner of tourist development.

State funds shall be contributed to any such organization only upon recommendation of the commissioner of tourist development and the approval by the commissioner of finance and administration.

Each organization operating under this section and §§ 4-3-2204, 4-3-2206, and 4-3-2208 shall prepare an annual audit report of its activities through June 30 of each year, and submit a copy of such report to the governor and the general assembly, and the commissioner of tourist development. Financial records of each participating organization shall be subject to audit by the comptroller of the treasury.

Funds appropriated to implement this section are subject to the approval of the governor and the commissioner of tourist development. Such funds or portions thereof shall be paid only upon certification by the appropriate official of each participating organization that matching local funds are available.

Such funds shall be from the appropriations of the department of tourist development, tourism division and shall be used for the sole purpose of permitting the state to match funds contributed by the local people involved. Any such funds not distributed under this section shall revert to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year.

Acts 1970, ch. 552, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 852, §§ 12, 14; Acts 1973, ch. 164, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1976, ch. 468, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 11-605, 11-25-105; Acts 1989, ch. 94, § 1; 1994, ch. 660, § 1; 2009, ch. 125, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The state planning office, referred to in this section, was abolished by Acts 1995, ch. 501, effective June 12, 1995.

This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Attorney General Opinions. Development districts need not be “regularly chartered, nonprofit tourist promotion organization[s]” in order to contract with the Tennessee Department of Tourist Development as regional tourism organizations, OAG 07-001 (1/4/07), 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 1.

4-3-2208. Annual appropriation — Expenditure.

The sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) annually, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of the general fund of the state, not otherwise appropriated, to the department of tourist development, for carrying out §§4-3-2204,4-3-2206 and4-3-2207 for maintenance and operation, including personal services, to be paid out of the general fund of the state treasury in the form and manner as now prescribed for the expenditures of other public funds.

Acts 1937, ch. 281, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.38 (Williams, § 630.29); impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 852, §§ 12, 14; impl. am. Acts 1976, ch. 468, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 11-604, 11-25-104.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

4-3-2209. Welcome centers and rest stops — Development of promotional content and training.

It is the intent of the state to promote and facilitate Tennessee's natural beauty and bountiful attractions. To the extent permitted by federal laws and regulations and the requirements of the federal highway administrator, all welcome centers supervised by the department may have photographs, posters, maps, music, books and other items that illustrate Tennessee's unique heritage and wealth of endeavors, from the historic to the peculiar, the traditional to the frivolous. Each welcome center may place an emphasis on events and sites that are within a fifty-mile radius within Tennessee.

The commissioner of tourist development shall develop promotional content and train staff members regarding all aspects of Tennessee life that are endearing to its citizens and captivating to its visitors. Emphasis may be placed on hidden treasures that a casual observer might miss, including natural sites such as waterfalls and caves, and man-made sites such as museums, seasonal events, and community celebrations. The commissioner of tourist development is encouraged to make Tennessee's welcome centers a place for travelers to enjoy and linger as tired limbs are stretched and eyes are rested.

Acts 2007, ch. 490, §§ 1, 2.

4-3-2210. Marketing of Reelfoot Lake as Tennessee Heritage Site.

The commissioner may strategically market Reelfoot Lake as a Tennessee Heritage Site for tourism development based on its geological history, natural resources, and other unique characteristics as funding may be available at the discretion of the commissioner.

Acts 2019, ch. 443, § 2.